incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix.xml
    <pardef n="dob/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ám</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ách</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dce/ra__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ři</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rám</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ru</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ry</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ři</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rách</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rou</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rami</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hlemýž/ď__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ď</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďů</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďům</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dích</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>děm</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ď<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mlá/dě__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďata</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>děte</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďat</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>děti</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďatům</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďata</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dě</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďata</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>děti</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďatech</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dětem</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ďaty</l>
          <r>dě<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anona"><i>anon</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čeština"><i>češtin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vteřina"><i>vteřin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strana"><i>stran</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dcera"><i>dce</i><par n="dce/ra__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvězda"><i>hvězd</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knihovna"><i>knihovn</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slovenština"><i>slovenštin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hodina"><i>hodin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ulita"><i>ulit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reciprocita"><i>reciprocit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunda"><i>kund</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="charita"><i>charit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rostlina"><i>rostlin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štětina"><i>štětin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karanténa"><i>karantén</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fauna"><i>faun</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dermatitida"><i>dermatitid</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="osoba"><i>osob</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pizda"><i>pizd</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="květina"><i>květin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debilita"><i>debilit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homokláda"><i>homoklád</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koruna"><i>korun</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minuta"><i>minut</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sloučenina"><i>sloučenin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bylina"><i>bylin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zima"><i>zim</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konfraternita"><i>konfraternit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="káva"><i>káv</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duna"><i>dun</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velryba"><i>velryb</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="invalidita"><i>invalidit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vagína"><i>vagín</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doprava"><i>doprav</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svoboda"><i>svobod</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jahoda"><i>jahod</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plošina"><i>plošin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anuita"><i>anuit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etiketa"><i>etiket</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mládě"><i>mlá</i><par n="mlá/dě__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostružina"><i>ostružin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nizozemština"><i>nizozemštin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jeřabina"><i>jeřabin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyfa"><i>hyf</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moréna"><i>morén</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spiritualita"><i>spiritualit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kopa"><i>kop</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cysta"><i>cyst</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dylina"><i>dylin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imunita"><i>imunit</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kokotina"><i>kokotin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izobáta"><i>izobát</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="savana"><i>savan</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angína"><i>angín</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doba"><i>dob</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="norština"><i>norštin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlemýžď"><i>hlemýž</i><par n="hlemýž/ď__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puberta"><i>pubert</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žena"><i>žen</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hygiena"><i>hygien</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bronchitida"><i>bronchitid</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cena"><i>cen</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vana"><i>van</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juta"><i>jut</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ropa"><i>rop</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="němčina"><i>němčin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokomotiva"><i>lokomotiv</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izochiona"><i>izochion</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katalánština"><i>katalánštin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kožešina"><i>kožešin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galeona"><i>galeon</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mlhovina"><i>mlhovin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="píčovina"><i>píčovin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niva"><i>niv</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="želva"><i>želv</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polština"><i>polštin</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aorta"><i>aort</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alhidáda"><i>alhidád</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sekunda"><i>sekund</i><par n="dob/a__n"/></e>
